src/fst/morphology/compounding.lexc
!! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ==========================================================================
!               Eastern and Meadow Mari morphological analyser   
! ==========================================================================


! Prefixing and compounding
! =========================

!LEXICON Prefixes
!       Mátta-+Use/Circ:Mát^ta-         ProperNoun ;
!       Davvi-+Use/Circ:Dav^vi-         ProperNoun ;


LEXICON R
 @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@P.CmpPref.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ RAlmostReal ; ! Flags to control compounding

LEXICON RAlmostReal    ! lexicalising the 3-part compounds, with the tag ShCmp

         RrealAfterCmpNFlags       ; ! Business as usual: Normal compounds right on to Rreal

! +Cmp#:∑# MiddleNouns ; ! These nouns should not return to themselves, to avoid -jotjotjot-
                       ! They thus point directly to Rreal.
 
!LEXICON Rreal ! This is the former R lexicon, renamed to avoid the MiddleNouns loop
! @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@P.CmpPref.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ RrealAfterCmpNFlags ; ! Flags to control compounding

LEXICON RrealAfterCmpNFlags ! This is the former R lexicon, renamed to avoid the MiddleNouns loop
                                     @U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp#:@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@∑#                 Noun      ; ! This is the normal case.
                      @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@∑#  Verb      ; ! Flag diacr declares that the compound
                      @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@∑#  Adjective ; ! needs a N tag later in the derivation

                @U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp/Hyph+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp#:@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@-                Noun      ; ! These 3 cases add a hyphen, so
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp/Hyph+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@- Verb      ; ! Sem-julggaštus and maana-gåetie
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp/Hyph+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@- Adjective ; ! are allowed.

                +Cmp/Hyph+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp#:-                Noun      ; ! These 3 cases add a hyphen, so
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Cmp/Hyph+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@- Verb      ; ! Sem-julggaštus and maana-gåetie
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Cmp/Hyph+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@- Adjective ; ! are allowed.

                      @U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp/SoftHyph+Err/Orth+Cmp#:@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@­                  Noun      ; ! These 3 cases add a SOFT hyphen, to
       @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp/SoftHyph+Err/Orth+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@­   Verb      ; ! make it possible to analyse certain texts
       @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp/SoftHyph+Err/Orth+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@­   Adjective ; ! from printing houses and newspapers.

! NB! ! ! The soft hyphens in the three last lines above are INVISIBLE! Even in SEE.
! There really IS a character in front of the space and the continuation lexicon.
! It is visible in tools like Emacs, UnicodeChecker and hexadecimal editors. DO NOT
! EDIT THESE LINES WIHTOUT THE PROPER TOOLS TO CHECK THAT ALL IS CORRECT!!!

               @U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp-#:@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@-∑# Acronym    ; ! maana-tv, "lomme-cd-spelar"
               @U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp-#:@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@-∑# Numeral    ; ! maana-123
               @U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp-#:@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@-∑# ProperNoun ; ! Proper nouns as the 2nd part of compounds for non-hyph.
                                                                                                            ! words. viessu-London goes through here.
                @U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Cmp-#:@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@-∑#  HyphNouns  ; ! Go to words requiring hyphens, like -tv- and -cd-

+Cmp/SplitR@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Use/SpellNoSugg:-@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@   ENDLEX     ; ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept - want this in speller

+Cmp/SplitR+Use/SpellNoSugg:-   ENDLEX     ; ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept - want this in speller

!+Use/-Spell:                                      R-LAGAN ; !This should not be Cmp

!LEXICON RHyph ! Recursive lexicon from all classes REQUIRING a hyphen to follow.
!              ! NBNBNB! ! ! The hyphen should be added here! NOT in the other lexicons!
! @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@P.CmpPref.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@@C.CmpHyph@ RHyphTags ; ! Flags to control compounding

!LEXICON RHyphTags
!                +Cmp-#:-∑#                Noun       ; ! This is the normal case.
!                +Cmp-#:-∑#                HyphNouns  ; ! Go to nouns requiring hyphens, like -tv- and -cd-
! @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Cmp-#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@-∑# Verb       ; ! Flag diacr declares that the compound
! @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Cmp-#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@-∑# Adjective  ; ! needs a N tag later in the derivation
!                +Cmp-#:-∑#                Acronym    ; ! maana-tv, "lomme-cd-spelar"
!                +Cmp-#:-∑#                Numeral    ; ! NRK-2
!                +Cmp-#:-∑#                ProperNoun ; ! Proper nouns as the 2nd part of compounds for hyph-words.
                                                        ! London-Hull is covered here, whereas Hull-viessu
                                                        ! is covered by RHyph + Noun.
!+Cmp/SplitR+Use/SpellNoSugg:-                 ENDLEX     ; ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept - want this in speller

! Proper noun and other hyph word compounds WITHOUT hyphens are covered HERE
! and are marked +Err/Orth as well as +Cmp/NoHyph. Examples: LondonHull & viessuLondon.
! The lemma string is still given WITH the hyphen - we want identical lemma for both sub and norm.
!                +Err/Orth+Cmp/NoHyph+Cmp-#:∑#                Noun       ; ! This is the normal case.
!                +Err/Orth+Cmp/NoHyph+Cmp-#:∑#                HyphNouns  ; ! Go to nouns requiring hyphens, like -tv- and -cd-
! @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Err/Orth+Cmp/NoHyph+Cmp-#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@∑# Verb       ; ! Flag diacr declares that the compound
! @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Err/Orth+Cmp/NoHyph+Cmp-#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@∑# Adjective  ; ! needs a N tag later in the derivation
!                +Err/Orth+Cmp/NoHyph+Cmp-#:∑#                Acronym    ; ! maanatv, "lommecdspelar"
!                +Err/Orth+Cmp/NoHyph+Cmp-#:∑#                Numeral    ; ! NRK2
!                +Err/Orth+Cmp/NoHyph+Cmp-#:∑#                ProperNoun ; ! Proper nouns as the 2nd part of compounds for hyph-words.


!LEXICON RNum
!      +Cmp-#:-∑# Noun ; ! For Num Cmp Noun, vi vil ikke ha Num Cmp Num 


!LEXICON Rnoun
!              :%>  Rreal  ; ! Going to the compound lexicon
! +Attr+Err/Orth: ENDLEX ; ! Kárášjot, as independent (sub) word

!LEXICON RProp                         !!≈ !!!@CODE@
! @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@P.CmpPref.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ RPropTags ; ! Flags to control compounding
! +Cmp-#namma:»»»-nammas DER-SAS ;
 
!LEXICON RPropTags
                                          !!           A special lexicon for handling proper noun compounding without hyphens
!                @C.CmpHyph@   RHyphTags ; !!≈ ; @CODE@ : This is the regular case, giving hyphens to compounds
!  @D.CmpHyph.TRUE@@U.CmpHyph.FALSE@+Use/-Spell+Cmp#:@D.CmpHyph.TRUE@@U.CmpHyph.FALSE@∑# Noun      ; !!≈ ; @CODE@ : This is the special case, going directly to nouns (''not'' to NounRoot,
                                          !!           as that would allow compounding with words explicitly coded to disallow
                                          !!           such compounds)

!LEXICON flagON-R
!@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@ R ;

!LEXICON flagOFF-R
!@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@ R ;

!LEXICON R-LAGAN To be added as derivation
! +Der1+Der2+Der/laakan+Use/Circ+Use/-Spell:» LAGAN ; ! ! biilalágan, noaidelágán noaiddilágán beatnagalágán beanalágán all these goes
!                                                      ! Nielsen: beatnatlágán, beatnatlágáš, beanalágáš, giđalágáš, áhččelágáš,
! +Der1+Der2+Der/laagasj+Use/Circ+Use/-Spell:» LAGAS ; ! ! etc.
